Utah statutes.
49-18-502.   Benefits payable upon death of retired member.
(1) (a)  The death benefit payable to a retiree's spouse at the time of death
is an allowance equal to 65% of the allowance which was being paid to the
retiree at the time of death.
(b)  The effective date of the accrual of this allowance is the first day of
the month following the month in which the retiree died.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding the amount of the allowance under Subsection (1), at
the time of retirement, a retiree may elect to increase the spousal death
benefit up to 75% of an allowance computed in accordance with Section
49-18-402.
(b)  If an election is made under Subsection (2)(a), the member's allowance
shall be reduced to an amount payable monthly for life to reflect the
actuarial equivalent necessary to pay for the increased spousal death benefit
above 65%.
